src/orthography/downcase-derived_proper-strings.xfscript
# Make initial downcasing after the misnamed U.Cap.Opt
# This gives oslolaš across the board
# like Pariisi -> pariisilainen

# ---- starts here: ------

# Various flag definitions to handle both regular downcase and downcase on hfst
# transducers with hyperminimisation. HypMin converts each lexicon name to a
# flag diacritic, and the result is that there can be more symbols before the
# initial letter of a word.
#
# NB! Note that the lexicon name of the proper nouns can be different from what
# is defined here. Change if required!

define DowncaseFlag  "@U.Cap.Opt@"            ;
define CmpHyph       "@U.CmpHyph.TRUE@"       ;
define LexRootFlag   "@P.LEXNAME.Root@"       ;
define LexProperFlag "@P.LEXNAME.propernouns-toponyms-Komi@" ;

read regex [ 
А -> а,
Б -> б,
В -> в,
Г -> г,
Д -> д,
Е -> е,
Ё -> ё,
Ж -> ж,
З -> з,
И -> и,
І -> і,
Й -> й,
К -> к,
Л -> л,
М -> м,
Н -> н,
О -> о,
Ӧ -> ӧ,
П -> п,
Р -> р,
С -> с,
Т -> т,
У -> у,
Ф -> ф,
Х -> х,
Ц -> ц,
Ч -> ч,
Ш -> ш,
Щ -> щ,
Ъ -> ъ,
Ы -> ы,
Ь -> ь,
Э -> э,
Ю -> ю,
Я -> я
 || .#. ( LEXROOTFLAG ) DCASEFLAG ( LEXPROPERFLAG ) ( HYPHFLAG )       ( ? ) _ ,
                        DCASEFLAG ( LEXPROPERFLAG ) ( HYPHFLAG ) ?* %- ( ? ) _

# ---- ends here: ------

# The lower context fixes issue when downcasing words like Davvi-Suopma
# -> davvi-suopmelaš

# Kept for reference: The old version, i.e., 
# The Book's treatment of paloaltolainen and pariisilainen, p. 368 ff.
# Allow optional initial downcasing after @U.Cap.Opt@ 
#A (->) a, B (->) b, C (->) c, D (->) d, E (->) e, 
#F (->) f, G (->) g, H (->) h, I (->) i, J (->) j, 
#K (->) k, L (->) l, M (->) m, N (->) n, O (->) o, 
#P (->) p, Q (->) q, R (->) r, S (->) s, T (->) t, 
#U (->) u, V (->) v, W (->) w, X (->) x, Y (->) y, 
#Z (->) z, Á (->) á,
#Č (->) č, Đ (->) đ, Ŋ (->) ŋ, Š (->) š, Ŧ (->) ŧ, Ž (->) ž
#|| .#. %@U%.Cap%.Opt%@ _ 
#.o. 
# No uppercase in the middle of a downcasable word
#A->a, B->b, C->c, D->d, E->e, F->f, G->g, H->h,
#I->i, J->j, K->k, L->l, M->m, N->n, O->o, P->p,
#Q->q, R->r, S->s, T->t, U->u, V->v, W->w, X->x,
#Y->y, Z->z  || %@U%.Cap%.Opt%@ ?+ _
#.o. 
# Eliminate internal spaces inside a downcasable word 
# Spaces are indicated here with the literal 
# underscore character 
#%_  -> [] || .#. %@U%.Cap%.Opt%@ ?+ _ 

] ;

substitute defined DowncaseFlag  for DCASEFLAG
substitute defined CmpHyph       for HYPHFLAG
substitute defined LexRootFlag   for LEXROOTFLAG
substitute defined LexProperFlag for LEXPROPERFLAG
